RuneDictionaries/Expanded Dictionary/SymbolRunes/HYPHEN.txt
50b
50b
50b
50b
50b
50b
50b
50b
50b
50b
50b
50b
50b
50b
50b
50b
50b
50b
50b
50b
50b
4b 40r 6b
4b 41r 5b
4b 41r 5b
4b 3r 35b 3r 5b
4b 3r 35b 3r 5b
4b 3r 34b 4r 5b
4b 32r 4b 4r 6b
4b 31r 4b 4r 7b
4b 30r 4b 4r 8b
29b 4r 4b 4r 9b
28b 4r 4b 4r 10b
27b 4r 4b 4r 11b
26b 4r 4b 4r 12b
25b 4r 4b 4r 13b
24b 4r 4b 4r 14b
23b 4r 4b 4r 15b
22b 4r 4b 4r 16b
21b 4r 4b 4r 17b
21b 3r 4b 4r 18b
21b 3r 3b 4r 19b
21b 4r 1b 4r 20b
22b 7r 21b
23b 5r 22b
24b 3r 23b
50b
50b
50b
50b
50b
